Iowa, session 2025-2026, SF2268.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 TLSB 6692XS (3) 91 nls/ko S.F. 2268 Section 1. NEW SECTION . 15.123 Iowa-Ireland trade 1 commission. 2 1. There is created the Iowa-Ireland trade commission. 3 The authority shall provide administrative support for the 4 commission. 5 2. The commission shall be composed of the following 6 members: 7 a. Two state senators appointed by the majority leader of 8 the senate. Each senator shall have knowledge of or current or 9 past involvement in organizations that promote Irish affairs 10 or shall have interest in the well-being of trade relations 11 between the state and the Republic of Ireland. 12 b. Two state representatives appointed by the speaker of 13 the house of representatives. Each representative shall have 14 knowledge of or current or past involvement in organizations 15 that promote Irish affairs or shall have interest in the 16 well-being of trade relations between the state and the 17 Republic of Ireland. 18 c. A representative of a private sector association 19 headquartered in the state and focused on the promotion of 20 international trade, appointed by the chair of the legislative 21 council. 22 d. A representative of the authority, appointed by the 23 governor. 24 e. A representative of an Iowa private industry, appointed 25 by the majority leader of the senate. 26 f. A representative of an Iowa private industry, appointed 27 by the speaker of the house of representatives. 28 3. Each member of the commission shall serve for a term 29 of two years and may be reappointed without limit. A vacancy 30 on the commission shall be filled by the original appointing 31 authority for the remainder of the term. 32 4. A commission member shall not receive compensation for 33 services, but shall be reimbursed for actual and necessary 34 expenses, including travel expenses. There is appropriated 35 -1- LSB 6692XS (3) 91 nls/ko 1/ 4 S.F. 2268 from the general fund of the state to the authority an amount 1 sufficient to pay costs incurred under this subsection. 2 5. At the initial meeting of the commission and biannually 3 thereafter, the commission members shall select a chairperson 4 from the state senators and state representatives appointed to 5 serve on the commission. 6 6. The commission shall meet a minimum of once per quarter, 7 at the call of the chairperson. The commission may meet or 8 hold hearings at any location that will best serve the citizens 9 of the state. All meetings or hearings of the commission shall 10 be scheduled and conducted in compliance with chapter 21. 11 7. The commissionâs records shall be considered public 12 records pursuant to chapter 22. 13 8. A majority of the members of the commission is a quorum, 14 and a majority of a quorum may act in any matter within the 15 jurisdiction of the commission. 16 9. The Iowa-Ireland trade commission shall do all of the 17 following: 18 a. Promote the advancement of bilateral trade and investment 19 between this state and the Republic of Ireland. 20 b. Recommend joint action on policy issues of mutual 21 interest to this state and the Republic of Ireland. 22 c. Promote business and academic exchanges between this 23 state and the Republic of Ireland. 24 d. Encourage mutual economic support between this state and 25 the Republic of Ireland. 26 e. Encourage mutual investment in the infrastructure of this 27 state and the Republic of Ireland. 28 f. Address other issues as determined by the commission. 29 10. The commission shall submit a report to the governor and 30 the general assembly within one calendar year of the date of 31 the commissionâs organizational meeting, and by February 1 of 32 each year thereafter. The report shall detail the commissionâs 33 meetings, activities, and expenses for the immediately 34 preceding calendar year. 35 -2- LSB 6692XS (3) 91 nls/ko 2/ 4 S.F. 2268